Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 1 Intergovernmental Cooperation

Applicability. —

Where a county's growth management plan was adopted as an individual land use plan and not as a joint land use plan with two other cities, there was no need to comply with the statutory requirements under this chapter. Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2005 WY 54, 110 P.3d 875,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions § 228.

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 105, 139 to 145.